Utah statutes.
53-7-205.   State fire code amendments -- Board duties and responsibilities.
(1)  The board shall receive from a city, county, or fire protection district
requests for amendments to the state fire code.
(2)  The division or the board on its own initiative may make recommendations
to the division for amendments to the state fire code.
(3) (a)  Within 45 days after receipt of a request or recommendation
concerning an amendment, the board shall direct the division to convene an
informal hearing concerning the amendment.
(b)  The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of the board.
(c)  The board shall decide to accept, modify, or reject the amendment.
(4)  Within 15 days following the completion of the hearing, the board shall
direct the division to send written notification, in a form prescribed by the
board, to the city, county, or fire protection district of its decision.
(5)  The board shall make rules incorporating the amendments accepted or
modified under Subsection (3).
